Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
In General
§ 31-7-18.
Purchase of certain motor vehicles.

In addition to the method of purchasing authorized in this chapter, said governing authorities are hereby authorized to accept the lowest bid received from a motor vehicle dealer domiciled within the county of the governing authority for the purchase of any motor vehicle having a gross vehicle weight rating of less than twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds that shall not exceed a sum equal to three percent (3%) greater than the price or cost which the dealer pays the manufacturer, as evidenced by the factory invoice for the motor vehicle. In the event said county does not have an authorized motor vehicle dealer, said board or governing authority may, in like manner, receive bids from motor vehicle dealers in any adjoining county.

No purchase of a motor vehicle under the provisions of this section shall be valid unless the purchase is made according to statutory bidding and licensing requirements. Provided, however, that the governing authorities may choose to purchase a motor vehicle from the authorized state contract dealer without having to advertise and receive bids therefor.

No purchase shall be made in excess of the approved state contract price by any of the aforementioned governing authorities when such authorities are situated wholly or in part in the county wherein the authorized state contract dealer for a particular item is domiciled.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 7, eff from and after January 1, 1981.

§ 31-7-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1993, ch. 556, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§31-7-19. [Codes, 1942, § 9024-10; Laws, 1962, ch. 497, § 13; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 8; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 159; Laws, 1985, ch. 493, § 7; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 19]

§ 31-7-21.
Functions of Department of Finance and Administration.

The provisions of this chapter shall neither repeal nor modify the functions of the Governor’s Office of General Services as set forth in Sections 31-11-1 through 31-11-89.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9024-11; Laws, 1962, ch. 497, § 14; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 22; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 9; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 73, eff from and after passage (approved August 16, 1988).

§ 31-7-23.
Rebates, refunds, etc. from vendor to inure to benefit of agency or governing authority.

Any rebates, refunds, coupons, merit points, gratuities or any article of value tendered or received by any agency or governing authority from any vendor of material, supplies, equipment or other articles shall inure to the benefit of the agency or governing authority making the purchase. The agency or governing authority may, in accordance with its best interest, either take delivery of the article of value tendered and use the same or convert it to cash by selling it for its fair and reasonable value, making use of the proceeds from such sale for the exclusive benefit of the agency or governing authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9024.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 480, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 10, eff from and after January 1, 1981.

§§ 31-7-25 through 31-7-37.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1980, ch 440, § 28, eff from and after January 1, 1981.

§31-7-27. [Codes, 1942, § 9026.5-02; Laws, 1962, ch. 414, § 2]

§31-7-29. [Codes, 1942, § 9026.5-03; Laws, 1962, ch. 414, § 3]

§31-7-31. [Codes, 1942, § 9026.5-04; Laws, 1962, ch. 414, § 4]

§31-7-33. [Codes, 1942, § 9026.5-05; Laws, 1962, ch. 414, § 5]

§31-7-35. [Codes, 1942, § 9026.5-06; Laws, 1962, ch. 414, § 6]

§31-7-37. [Codes, 1942, § 9026.5-07; Laws, 1962, ch. 414, § 7]

§ 31-7-38.
Establishment of group purchasing programs by certain public hospitals and regional mental health centers.

The board of trustees or governing board of any hospital or regional mental health center owned or owned and operated separately or jointly by the State of Mississippi or any of its branches, agencies, departments or subdivisions, or by one or more counties, cities, towns, supervisors districts or election districts, or combinations thereof, may authorize by resolution the organization and operation of, or the participation in, a group purchasing program with other hospitals or regional mental health centers, for the purchase of supplies, commodities and equipment when it appears to the board of trustees or governing board that such a group purchasing program could or would affect economy or efficiency in their operations. Purchases by hospitals or regional mental health centers participating in group purchasing programs of supplies, commodities and equipment through such programs shall be exempt from the provisions of Sections 31-7-9, 31-7-10, 31-7-11, 31-7-12 and 31-7-13.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 330; Laws, 1979, ch. 507; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 11; Laws, 1982, ch. 499, § 2; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 66; Laws, 1990, ch. 520, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 322, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 471, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 318, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 345, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 444, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 395, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§§ 31-7-39 through 31-7-45.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 28, eff from and after January 1, 1981.

§31-7-39. [Codes, Hemingway's 1917, § 6660; 1930, § 6064; Laws, 1942, § 9027; Laws, 1914, ch. 206; Laws, 1946, ch. 375, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 292, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 392, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 362; Laws, 1960, ch. 392, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 268; Laws, 1962, ch. 414; Laws, 1962, ch. 508, § 8; Laws, 1966, ch. 550, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 512, § 1; Am Laws, 1973, ch. 426 § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 541, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 470, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 491; Laws, 1977, ch. 423; Laws, 1980, ch. 396]

§31-7-41. [Codes, Hemingway's 1917, § 6660; 1930, § 6064; Laws, 1942, § 9027; Laws, 1914, ch. 206; Laws, 1946, ch. 375, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 292, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 392, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 362; Laws, 1960, ch. 392, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 268; Laws, 1962, ch. 414; Laws, 1962, ch. 508, § 8; Laws, 1966, ch. 550, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 512, § 1; Am Laws, 1975, ch. 470 § 2]

§31-7-43. [Codes, Hemingway's 1917, § 6660; 1930, § 6064; 1942, § 9027; Laws, 1914, ch. 206; Laws, 1946, ch. 375, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 292, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 392, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 362; Laws, 1960, ch. 392, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 268; Laws, 1962, ch. 414; Laws, 1962, ch. 508, § 8; Laws, 1966, ch. 550, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 512, § 1; Am Laws 1975, ch. 470 § 3]

§31-7-45. [Codes, Hemingway's 1917, § 6660; 1930, § 6064; Laws, 1942, § 9027; Laws, 1914, ch. 206; Laws, 1946, ch. 375, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 292, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 392, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 362; Laws, 1960, ch. 392, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 268; Laws, 1962, ch. 414; Laws, 1962, ch. 508, § 8; Laws, 1966, ch. 550, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 512, § 1]

§ 31-7-47.
Preference to resident contractors.

In the letting of public contracts, preference shall be given to resident contractors, and a nonresident bidder domiciled in a state, city, county, parish, province, nation or political subdivision having laws granting preference to local contractors shall be awarded Mississippi public contracts only on the same basis as the nonresident bidder’s state, city, county, parish, province, nation or political subdivision awards contracts to Mississippi contractors bidding under similar circumstances. Resident contractors actually domiciled in Mississippi, be they corporate, individuals or partnerships, are to be granted preference over nonresidents in awarding of contracts in the same manner and to the same extent as provided by the laws of the state, city, county, parish, province, nation or political subdivision of domicile of the nonresident.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6660; 1930, § 6064; 1942, § 9027; Laws, 1914, ch. 206; Laws, 1946, ch. 375, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 292, § 1; ch. 392, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 362; Laws, 1960, ch. 392, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, chs. 268, 414, 508, § 8; Laws, 1966, ch. 550, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 512, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 12; Laws, 1995, ch. 408, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§ 31-7-48.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 28, eff from and after January 1, 1981.

§31-7-48. [En, Laws, 1973, ch. 426, § 1]

§ 31-7-49.
Purchases under contract.

In placing orders for purchases under bids received and contracts awarded under the provisions of this chapter, the governing authority, by orders entered on its minutes, may authorize its members, or agents designated by its order, to place orders for the purchase of such supplies and materials from time to time during the period covered by the contract, as such supplies and materials are needed. Claims for such supplies so ordered by an individual board member or other duly authorized agent shall not be allowed and paid by the board until such claims shall have been approved in writing by the individual board member or agent who ordered such supplies or the successor to such member or agent.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9027-01; Laws, 1950, ch. 292, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 13; Laws, 1981, ch. 306, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 480, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 31-7-51.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1993, ch. 556, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§31-7-51. [Codes, 1942, § 9027-11; Laws, 1956, ch. 373]

§ 31-7-53.
Fertilizer.

In making any and all purchases of fertilizer for all state institutions and agencies, the board, officer, or employee given the authority to make such purchases shall take into consideration the chemical analysis and percentage of plant food unit value in such fertilizer in determining the lowest and best bid. No awards of contracts shall be made until the best price is determined on the basis of the chemical analysis as to the plant food unit value of the product, and the contract shall be awarded on the basis of such an analysis of the plant food unit value.

This section does not apply for the purchase of material by research agencies of the state for use in experimental projects.

The state penitentiary board, the board of trustees of the state institutions of higher learning, and any other agency, department, or board of trustees of the State of Mississippi are hereby authorized to purchase all needed quantities of anhydrous ammonia and ammonium nitrate fertilizers available through the facilities of Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science. Such purchase may be at public or private sale, provided that such fertilizers can be obtained for not more than the price that the same are then available to such board, agency, or department from any other source.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 9027-12, 9027-14; Laws, 1956, ch. 142; Laws, 1958, ch. 146.

§ 31-7-55.
Penalties.

[For penalties applicable to violations occurring between January 1, 1981, and August 15, 1988, the following provisions govern.]

It is hereby declared to be unlawful and a violation of public policy of the State of Mississippi for any elected or appointed public officer of the state or the executive head of a state board, commission, department, subdivision of the state government or governing authority to make any purchases without the full compliance with the provisions of Chapter 7, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972. Any elected or appointed public officer of the state or the executive head of a state board, commission, department, subdivision of the state government or governing authority who violates the provisions of Chapter 7, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972 shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each separate offense, or sentenced to the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or both such fine and imprisonment, and shall be removed from his office or position.

Any person diverting the benefits of any article of value tendered or received by any agency or governing authority to his or her personal use, in violation of Section 31-7-23, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or sentenced to the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment, and shall be required to return the money value of the article unlawfully diverted to the agency involved.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6065; 1942, §§ 9024-14, 9024.5, 9027-02, 9028; Laws, 1950, ch. 292, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 480, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1970, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 14; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 67, eff from and after passage (approved August 16, 1988).

§ 31-7-55.
Penalties.

[The following provisions apply to violations which occur on or after August 16, 1988.]

It is hereby declared to be unlawful and a violation of public policy of the State of Mississippi for any elected or appointed public officer of an agency or a governing authority, or the executive head, any employee or agent of an agency or governing authority to make any purchases without the full compliance with the provisions of Chapter 7, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, any person who intentionally, willfully and knowingly violates the provisions of Chapter 7, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each separate offense, or sentenced to the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or both such fine and imprisonment, and shall be removed from his office or position.

Any person who intentionally, willfully and knowingly violates the provisions of subsection (1) of Section 31-7-57 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or sentenced to the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or both such fine and imprisonment, and shall be removed from his office or position.

Any person diverting the benefits of any article of value tendered or received by any agency or governing authority to his or her personal use, in violation of Section 31-7-23, if the value of such article be less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or sentenced to the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment, shall be removed from his office or position, and shall be required to return the money value of the article unlawfully diverted to the agency or governing authority involved. If the value of the article be Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more, such person shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or sentenced to the Department of Corrections for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment, shall be removed from his office or position, and shall be required to return the money value of the article unlawfully diverted to the agency or governing authority involved.

The provisions of this section are supplemental to any other criminal statutes of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6065; 1942, §§ 9024-14, 9024.5, 9027-02, 9028; Laws, 1950, ch. 292, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 480, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1970, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 14; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 67, eff from and after passage (approved August 16, 1988).

§ 31-7-57.
Individual liability for unlawful expenditures; disposition of recovered funds.

Any elected or appointed public officer of an agency or a governing authority, or the executive head, any employee or agent of an agency or governing authority, who appropriates or authorizes the expenditure of any money to an object not authorized by law, shall be liable personally for up to the full amount of the appropriation or expenditure as will fully and completely compensate and repay such public funds for any actual loss caused by such appropriation or expenditure, to be recovered by suit in the name of the governmental entity involved, or in the name of any person who is a taxpayer suing for the use of the governmental entity involved, and such taxpayer shall be liable for costs in such case. In the case of a governing board of an agency or governing authority, only the individual members of the governing board who voted for the appropriation or authorization for expenditure shall be liable under this subsection.

No individual member, officer, employee or agent of any agency or board of a governing authority shall let contracts or purchase commodities or equipment except in the manner provided by law, including the provisions of Section 25-9-120(3), Mississippi Code of 1972, relating to personal and professional service contracts by state agencies; nor shall any such agency or board of a governing authority ratify any such contract or purchase made by any individual member, officer, employee or agent thereof, or pay for the same out of public funds unless such contract or purchase was made in the manner provided by law; provided, however, that any vendor who, in good faith, delivers commodities or printing or performs any services under a contract to or for the agency or governing authority, shall be entitled to recover the fair market value of such commodities, printing or services, notwithstanding some error or failure by the agency or governing authority to follow the law, if the contract was for an object authorized by law and the vendor had no control of, participation in, or actual knowledge of the error or failure by the agency or governing authority.

The individual members, officers, employees or agents of any agency or governing authority as defined in Section 31-7-1 causing any public funds to be expended, any contract made or let, any payment made on any contract or any purchase made, or any payment made, in any manner whatsoever, contrary to or without complying with any statute of the State of Mississippi, regulating or prescribing the manner in which such contracts shall be let, payment on any contract made, purchase made, or any other payment or expenditure made, shall be liable, individually, and upon their official bond, for compensatory damages, in such sum up to the full amount of such contract, purchase, expenditure or payment as will fully and completely compensate and repay such public funds for any actual loss caused by such unlawful expenditure.

In addition to the foregoing provision, for any violation of any statute of the State of Mississippi prescribing the manner in which contracts shall be let, purchases made, expenditure or payment made, any individual member, officer, employee or agent of any agency or governing authority who shall substantially depart from the statutory method of letting contracts, making payments thereon, making purchases or expending public funds shall be liable, individually and on his official bond, for penal damages in such amount as may be assessed by any court of competent jurisdiction, up to three (3) times the amount of the contract, purchase, expenditure or payment. The person so charged may offer mitigating circumstances to be considered by the court in the assessment of any penal damages.

Any sum recovered under the provisions hereof shall be credited to the account from which such unlawful expenditure was made.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1) of this section, any individual member of an agency or governing authority as defined in Section 31-7-1 shall not be individually liable under this section if he voted against payment for contracts let or purchases made contrary to law and had his vote recorded in the official minutes of the board or governing authority at the time of such vote, or was absent at the time of such vote.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 444, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 15; Laws, 1981, ch. 306, § 4; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 68; Laws, 1997, ch. 609, § 8, eff from and after June 29, 1997.

§ 31-7-59.
Purchase by municipalities from United States General Services Administration.

Any municipality of over one hundred thousand (100,000) population, according to the latest decennial census and qualified to do so, is hereby empowered to purchase from the General Services Administration of the United States of America, without advertising for bids, any and all articles of supplies and equipment necessary for the operation of said municipality so long as the purchase price of such articles is below the purchase price of similar articles on a state contract accepted by the Office of General Services.

The aforesaid supplies and equipment may likewise be purchased from the General Services Administration without advertising for bids even though the Office of General Services does not have same listed on statewide contracts so long as the purchase price thereof is ten percent (10%) below the latest purchase price of comparable supplies and equipment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 388, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 160; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 31-7-61.
Governmental purchases of foreign beef; prohibition against.

It shall be unlawful for any person knowingly to purchase or to authorize or requisition the purchase of beef other than beef raised and produced within the United States when such purchase is to be paid by the state government or any of its political subdivisions out of public funds of any nature. However, all canned meats not available which are processed in the United States shall be exempt from Sections 31-7-61 through 31-7-65.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 345, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1975).

§ 31-7-63.
Governmental purchases of foreign beef; penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of Section 31-7-61 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days or by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00). In addition to any criminal sanction authorized herein, a civil proceeding may be brought by a district attorney or county prosecuting attorney for recovery of funds paid out in violation of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 345, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1975).

§ 31-7-65.
Governmental purchases of foreign beef; commissioner of agriculture and commerce to give notice.

The commissioner of agriculture and commerce of the State of Mississippi shall notify all state agencies, political subdivisions or public institutions within the State of Mississippi as to the provisions of Sections 31-7-61 through 31-7-65.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 345, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1975).

§§ 31-7-67 through 31-7-71.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 28, eff from and after January 1, 1981.

§31-7-67. [En Laws, 1976, ch. 466, § 1]

§31-7-69. [En Laws, 1976, ch. 466, § 2]

§31-7-71. [En Laws, 1976, ch. 466, § 3]

§ 31-7-73.
Authority of state agencies to contract for energy efficiency services.

Any state agency, as defined in Section 31-7-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to enter into an energy performance contract, energy services contract, on a shared-savings, lease or lease-purchase basis, for energy efficiency services and/or equipment as provided for in Section 31-7-14.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 493, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 481, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.